Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5755.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of Correction
shall establish a sick leave bank for Todd LaFreniere, an employee of the Department of
Correction. Any employee of the Department of Correction may voluntarily contribute 1 or more
sick, personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Todd LaFreniere. If Todd
LaFreniere terminates employment with the Department of Correction or requests to dissolve the
sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended
illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or
disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the
Department of Correction.
of 1